Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 7 Express Companies

Cross references.

Secretary of State corporations generally, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V and Ch. 4, T. 14.

46-9-230.
Manner of incorporation of express companies.

If a group of at least five persons (1) files a petition with the Secretary of State setting forth that they desire to be incorporated as an express company, the name under which they desire to be incorporated, the amount of capital stock which the company proposes to have, the place where the principal office of the company shall be located, and the states, territories, and countries in which the company proposes to operate, and (2) pays to the Secretary of State a fee of $100.00, to be deposited by the Secretary of State into the state treasury, then the Secretary of State shall issue to the petitioners the following certificate:

State of Georgia. To whom it may concern — Greetings:

_______________
having filed their petition in terms of the statute in such case provided, they and their associates and successors are hereby created and declared a body corporate for the period of 30 years, under the name of
_______________ , for the purpose of carrying on an express business in
_______________ , with a capital stock of
_______________
dollars, with its principal place of business at
_______________ , in the county of
_______________ , Georgia, with the powers, duties, and liabilities as now or hereafter prescribed by the laws of this state.

Witness my official hand and seal of this state, this
_______________
day of
_______________ ,
_______________ .

History.

Ga. L. 1893, p. 84, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 2000; Civil Code 1910, § 2381; Code 1933, § 41-101; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 46.

46-9-231.
Organization of express companies.

The petitioners shall be the first directors of the company. Upon receiving the prescribed certificate, the directors shall organize by electing one of their number president and shall elect such other corporate officers as may be necessary; and they shall open books of subscription to the capital stock of said company. When all the capital stock has been subscribed for and one-tenth of the amount actually paid in, notice of that fact shall be published at least three times in the newspaper in which the sheriff’s notices are published in the county of the principal office of the company; whereupon, but not before, the company may begin the transaction of business. If the transaction of any business is commenced without complying with the requirements of this Code section, the incorporators and stockholders shall be personally liable for all obligations incurred prior to a full compliance with those requirements.

History.

Ga. L. 1893, p. 84, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 2001; Civil Code 1910, § 2382; Code 1933, § 41-102.

46-9-232.
Location of principal office.

All companies incorporated under this article shall have their principal offices in this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1893, p. 84, § 4; Civil Code 1895, § 2003; Civil Code 1910, § 2384; Code 1933, § 41-103.

46-9-233.
Powers of express companies generally.

Any company incorporated under this article may:

Sue and be sued;

Have a corporate seal;

Contract and be contracted with;

Take bonds of indemnity with security from its agents and employees;

Acquire, by purchase, devise, or otherwise, and hold real and personal property of any value in the amount necessary and proper for the purpose for which the company is incorporated and sell, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of the same;

Appoint all necessary officers;

Make rules, regulations, bylaws, and ordinances for the control, direction, management, and operation of its affairs and business, not inconsistent with the laws of this state or of the United States; and

Have, enjoy, and exercise all the rights, powers, and privileges pertaining to corporate bodies and necessary for the purposes for which such corporation is created within this state and within all the states and territories of the United States and any foreign countries enumerated in the certificate of incorporation, that shall permit or suffer the exercise of said corporate powers within their limits.

History.

Ga. L. 1893, p. 84, § 3; Civil Code 1895, § 2002; Civil Code 1910, § 2383; Code 1933, § 41-104.

46-9-234.
Venue; binding effect of judgment.

The superior court of the county where goods are received for shipment by an express company doing business in this state or the superior court of the county where goods are to be delivered by such a company, shall have jurisdiction over that company, and the judgment shall bind all the property of that company.

History.

Ga. L. 1862-63, p. 162, § 2; Ga. L. 1865-66, p. 222, § 1; Code 1868, § 3333; Code 1873, § 3410; Code 1882, § 3410; Civil Code 1895, § 2004; Civil Code 1910, § 2385; Code 1933, § 41-201.

Law reviews.

For note discussing problems with venue in Georgia, and proposing statutory revisions to improve the resolution of venue questions, see 9 Ga. St. B.J. 254 (1972).

46-9-235.
Service of process; effect of judgment.

In all cases where its chief officer does not reside in this state, an express company may be served in any proceeding against it by serving a copy of the summons and complaint upon any agent of such company within this state. The judgment obtained in cases so commenced shall bind the property of the defendant as fully as though the summons and complaint had been served on the president or other chief officer.

History.

Ga. L. 1862-63, p. 162, § 1; Ga. L. 1865-66, p. 222, § 1; Code 1868, § 3334; Code 1873, § 3411; Code 1882, § 3411; Civil Code 1895, § 2005; Civil Code 1910, § 2386; Code 1933, § 41-202.

46-9-236.
Posting of name of president or chief officer of express company.

When the president or other chief officer of any express company resides in this state, it shall be the duty of such company to post in a public and conspicuous place, at each office where it transacts business, the name of its president or other chief officer on whom service may be perfected in this state; otherwise, service made as provided for in Code Section 46-9-235 shall be deemed sufficient and proper service.

History.

Ga. L. 1865-66, p. 222, § 2; Code 1868, § 3335; Code 1873, § 3412; Code 1882, § 3412; Civil Code 1895, § 2006; Civil Code 1910, § 2387; Code 1933, § 41-203.